pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Equipamento de wallyball: Bolas para wallyball; Redes de wallyball; Conjuntos de wallyball
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Echipament pentru wallyball: Mingi de wallyball; Plase de wallyball; Seturi de wallyball
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Oprema za wallyball: Lopte za wallyball; Mreže za wallyball; Kompleti za wallyball
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Thiết bị bóng tường: Quả bóng tường; Lưới bóng tường; Bộ bóng tường
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Udstyr til wallyball: Wallyball-bolde; Wallyball-net; Wallyball-sæt
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 壁排球用品: 軟排球; 軟排球網; 軟排球組
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Εξοπλισμός wallyball: Μπάλες wallyball; Δίχτυα wallyball; Σετ wallyball
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Wallyball-utstyr: Wallyball-baller; Wallyball-nett; Wallyball-sett
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Екипировка за уолибол: Топки за уолибол; Мрежи за уолибол; Комплекти за уолибол
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 월리볼 장비: 월리볼 공; 월리볼 네트; 월리볼 세트
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > อุปกรณ์วอลลี่บอล: ลูกวอลลี่บอล; ตาข่ายวอลลี่บอล; ชุดวอลลี่บอล
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Инвентарь для воллибола: Мячи для воллибола; Сетки для воллибола; Наборы инвентаря для воллибола
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Wallyball Equipment: Wallyball Balls; Wallyball Nets; Wallyball Sets
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Wallyball-varusteet: Wallyball-pallot; Wallyball-verkot; Wallyball-setit
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Volibolo įranga: Volibolo kamuoliai; Volibolo tinklai; Volibolo rinkiniai
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Equipamento de wallyball: Bolas de wallyball; Redes de wallyball; Conjuntos de wallyball
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Attrezzature da wallyball: Palle da wallyball; Reti da wallyball; Set da wallyball
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Wallyball-Ausrüstung: Wallyball-Bälle; Wallyball-Netze; Wallyball-Sets
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > ウォーリーボール用品: ウォーリーボール用ボール; ウォーリーボール用ネット; ウォーリーボール用セット
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Vybavení na wallyball: Míče na wallyball; Sítě pro wallyball; Sady pro wallyball
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 壁排球设备: 壁排球; 壁排球网; 壁排球套装
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Équipement de wallyball: Ballons de wallyball; Filets de wallyball; Sets de wallyball
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Wallyball Malzemeleri: Wallyball Topları; Wallyball Ağları; Wallyball Setleri
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Benodigdheden voor wallybal: Ballen voor wallybal; Netten voor wallybal; Sets voor wallybal
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Wallyball-utrustning: Wallyball-bollar; Wallyball-nät; Wallyball-set
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Sprzęt do gry w wallyball: Piłki do siatkówki; Siatki do wallyballa; Zestawy do siatkówki
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Wallyball-felszerelés: Wallyball-labdák; Wallyball-hálók; Wallyball-szettek
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Wallyballové vybavenie: Wallyballové lopty; Wallyballové siete; Wallyballové súpravy
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Equipamiento para wallyball: Bolas de wallyball; Redes de wallyball; Juegos de wallyball
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Oprema za wallyball: Žoge za wallyball; Mreže za wallyball; Kompleti za wallyball